Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.044

Public livestock market—Open consignment horse sale—Consignor's name.

It is lawful for the operator of a public livestock market or an open consignment horse sale, upon receiving a request to do so, to allow the announcement of the correct and accurate name of the consignor of any cattle or horses being presented for sale to potential buyers.

[ 1991 c 17 s 5.]